Vermont, session 2025-2026, H854.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Legislative Economic Incentive Act of 2026.”
VT LEG #386202 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.854
2026 Page 2 of 8
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A § 1051 is amended as follows:
§ 1051. SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE AND PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE
OF THE SENATE; COMPENSATION AND EXPENSE
REIMBURSEMENT
(a) The Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate
shall be entitled to receive annual compensation of $10,080.00 for the 2005
Biennial Session and thereafter, to be paid in biweekly payments, provided
that, beginning on January 1, 2007, the annual compensation shall be adjusted
annually thereafter by the cost of living adjustment negotiated for State
employees under the most recent collective bargaining agreement, except that,
beginning on July 1, 2021, and annually thereafter on January 1, the annual
compensation shall be adjusted consistent with the compensation increases
provided to other constitutional officers.
(b) In addition to the annual compensation, the Speaker and President Pro
Tempore shall be entitled to receive:
(1) $652.00 a week for the 2005 Biennial Session and thereafter, to be
paid in biweekly payments during the regular and adjourned sessions of the
General Assembly, provided that, beginning on January 1, 2007, the weekly
compensation shall be adjusted annually thereafter by the cost of living
adjustment negotiated for State employees under the most recent collective
bargaining agreement, except that, beginning on July 1, 2021, and annually
VT LEG #386202 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.854
2026 Page 3 of 8
thereafter on January 1, the weekly compensation shall be adjusted consistent
with the compensation increases provided to other constitutional officers;
(2) an amount equal to one-fifth of the annually adjusted weekly
compensation set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, rounded up to the
nearest dollar, per day during a special session of the General Assembly; and
(3) mileage, meals, and lodging expenses as provided to members of the
General Assembly under subsection 1052(b) of this title during the biennial,
adjourned, and special sessions of the General Assembly and in addition such
other actual and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in duties imposed
by law.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the biweekly payments
to the Speaker and President Pro Tempore shall be paid commencing with the
first day of the session and concluding on the first Friday in May, regardless of
whether the session adjourns prior to the first Friday in May. The Speaker and
President Pro Tempore shall not receive any additional payments if the regular
session continues beyond the first Friday in May and shall not receive any
reimbursement of expenses if the regular session extends more than three
weeks beyond the first Friday in May.
VT LEG #386202 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.854
2026 Page 4 of 8
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 1052 is amended as follows:
§ 1052. MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; COMPENSATION
AND EXPENSE REIMBURSEMENT
(a)(1)(A) Each member of the General Assembly, other than the Speaker of
the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, is entitled to a weekly
salary of $589.00 for the 2005 Biennial Session and thereafter, provided that,
beginning on January 1, 2007, the weekly compensation shall be adjusted
annually thereafter by the cost of living adjustment negotiated for State
employees under the most recent collective bargaining agreement, except that,
beginning on July 1, 2021, and annually thereafter on January 1, the weekly
compensation shall be adjusted consistent with the compensation increases
provided to other constitutional officers.
(B) The salary of members shall be paid in biweekly installments,
commencing with the first day of the session and concluding on the first Friday
in May, regardless of whether the session adjourns prior to the first Friday in
May. Members shall not receive any additional salary if the regular session
continues beyond the first Friday in May.
(2) During a special session, a member is entitled to an amount equal to
one-fifth of the annually adjusted weekly compensation set forth in subdivision
(1)(A) of this subsection, rounded up to the nearest dollar, for each day of a
VT LEG #386202 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.854
2026 Page 5 of 8
special session on which that the House of in which he or she is a the member
serves shall sit.
(b) During any session of the General Assembly, each member is entitled
to receive reimbursement of expenses as set forth in this subsection, except
that, beginning on July 1, 2026, members shall not receive reimbursement of
expenses if the regular session extends more than three weeks beyond the first
Friday in May.
(1) Mileage reimbursement. Each member shall be entitled to receive
reimbursement in an amount equal to the actual mileage traveled for each day
of session in which the member travels between Montpelier and the member’s
home or from Montpelier or from the member’s home to another site on
officially sanctioned legislative business. Reimbursement of actual mileage
traveled under this subdivision shall be at the rate per mile determined by the
federal Office of Government-wide Policy and published in the Federal
Register for the year of the session.
(2) Meals. Each member shall receive either a meals allowance or
reimbursement of actual meals expenses. A member shall be presumed to have
elected to receive the meals allowance unless the member informs the Office
of Legislative Operations Joint Fiscal Office by a date established by the
Office of Legislative Operations Joint Fiscal Office that the member wishes to
receive reimbursement of actual meals expenses. A member’s election to
VT LEG #386202 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.854
2026 Page 6 of 8
receive reimbursement of actual meals expenses shall remain in effect through
the remainder of that session unless the member notifies the Office, in writing,
that the member needs to change to the meals allowance due to a change in
circumstances or for another compelling reason.
(A) Meals allowance. A member who elects to receive a meals
allowance shall receive an amount equal to the daily amount for meals
determined for Montpelier, Vermont, by the federal Office of Government-
wide Policy and published in the Federal Register for the year of the session
for each day the House in which the member serves shall sit.
(B) Meals reimbursement. A member who elects to receive
reimbursement of expenses shall receive reimbursement equal to the actual
amounts expended by the member for meals for each day that the House in
which the member serves shall sit; provided, however, that the total amount of
the weekly reimbursement available pursuant to this subdivision (B) shall not
exceed the amount the member would have received for the same week if the
member had elected the meals allowance pursuant to subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (2). The member shall provide meal receipts or otherwise
substantiate the amounts expended to the Office of Legislative Operations
Joint Fiscal Office in the form and manner prescribed by the Director of
Legislative Operations Joint Fiscal Office.
VT LEG #386202 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.854
2026 Page 7 of 8
(3) Lodging. Each member shall receive either a lodging allowance or
reimbursement of actual lodging expenses. A member shall be presumed to
have elected to receive the lodging allowance unless the member informs the
Office of Legislative Operations Joint Fiscal Office by a date established by
the Office of Legislative Operations Joint Fiscal Office that the member wishes
to receive reimbursement of actual lodging expenses. A member’s election to
receive reimbursement of actual lodging expenses shall remain in effect
through the remainder of that session unless the member notifies the Office, in
writing, that the member needs to change to the lodging allowance due to a
change in circumstances or for another compelling reason.
(A) Lodging allowance. A member who elects to receive a lodging
allowance shall receive an amount equal to the daily amount for lodging
determined for Montpelier, Vermont, by the federal Office of Government-
wide Policy and published in the Federal Register for the year of the session
for each day the House in which the member serves shall sit.
(B) Lodging reimbursement. A member who elects to receive
reimbursement of expenses shall receive reimbursement equal to the actual
amounts expended by the member for lodging for each day that the House in
which the member serves shall sit; provided, however, that the total amount of
the weekly reimbursement available pursuant to this subdivision (B) for each
week shall not exceed the amount the member would have received for the
VT LEG #386202 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.854
2026 Page 8 of 8
same week if the member had elected the lodging allowance pursuant to
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3). The member shall provide lodging
receipts or otherwise substantiate the amounts expended to the Office of
Legislative Operations Joint Fiscal Office in the form and manner prescribed
by the Director of Legislative Operations Joint Fiscal Office.
(4) Absences. If a member is absent for reasons other than sickness or
legislative business for one or more entire days while the House in which the
member sits is in session, the member shall notify the Office of Legislative
Operations Joint Fiscal Office of that absence, and the member shall not be
entitled to receive or be reimbursed for mileage, meals, or lodging expenses
incurred during the period of that absence, except that lodging expenses
associated with a lease or rental agreement may be received or reimbursed
upon approval of either the Speaker of the House or the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386202 v.2